Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
200D

KANEOHE
BAY REGIONAL COUNCIL

Section

200D-1 Definitions

200D-2 Kaneohe Bay regional council;
establishment

200D-3 Kaneohe Bay regional council; general
powers, duties,

and functions

200D-4 Annual meeting

200D-5 Annual report

Note

L 2014, c 218, §8 purports to amend this chapter.

Cross References

Environmental courts, jurisdiction over proceedings arising
under this chapter, see §604A-2.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next